test/src/morphology/N-waro_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - варˮ: # Noun 'dirt' - partial paradigm /Type 32/
     варˮ+N+Sg+Nom: варˮ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Acc: вармʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Gen: варʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Dat: вартʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Loc: варкана
     варˮ+N+Sg+Abl: варкад
     варˮ+N+Sg+Pros: вармна
     варˮ+N+Du+Nom: варкʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Acc: варкʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Gen: варкʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Nom: варˮ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Acc: варо
     варˮ+N+Pl+Gen: вароˮ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Dat: варкˮ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Loc: варкаˮна
     варˮ+N+Pl+Abl: варкат
     варˮ+N+Pl+Pros: вароˮмана

     варˮ+N+Tra: [варˮӈэ, варӈэ]
     варˮ+N+Car: варциˮ
     варˮ+N+Equ: вартремʼ
     варˮ+N+Equ+Lat: вартревʼ

# Possessive forms !Local case forms need to be checked!
     варˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: варм
     варˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: вал  
     варˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: варта 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: вармиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: валиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: вартиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: вармаˮ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: валаˮ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: вартоʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: варм 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: варт  
     варˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: варта 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: вармиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: вартиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: вартиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: вармаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: вартаˮ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: вартоʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: варн 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: варт 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: варта 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: варниʼ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: вартиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: вартиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: варнаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: вартаˮ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: вартоʼ  
     варˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [варкан, варкани]  
     варˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: варканд  
     варˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: варканда 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: варканиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: варкандиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: варкандиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: варканаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: варкандаˮ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: варкандоʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [варканан, варканани]
     варˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: варкананд  
     варˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: варкананда 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: варкананиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: варканандиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: варканандиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: варкананаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: варканандаˮ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: варканандоʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [варкадан, варкадани]  
     варˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: варкаданд  
     варˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: варкаданда 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: варкаданиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: варкадандиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: варкадандиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: варкаданаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: варкадандаˮ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: варкадандоʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [вармнан, вармнани]
     варˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: вармнанд  
     варˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: вармнанда 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: вармнаниʼ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: вармнандиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: вармнандиʼ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: вармнанаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: вармнандаˮ
     варˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: вармнандоʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: варкаюн  
     варˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: варкаюд  
     варˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: варкаюда 
     варˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: варкаюниʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: варкаюдиʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: варкаюдиʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: варкаюнаˮ
     варˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: варкаюдаˮ
     варˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: варкаюдоʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: варкаюн  
     варˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: варкаюд  
     варˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: варкаюда 
     варˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: варкаюниʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: варкаюдиʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: варкаюдиʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: варкаюнаˮ
     варˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: варкаюдаˮ
     варˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: варкаюдоʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: варкаюн  
     варˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: варкают  
     варˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: варкаюта 
     варˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: варкаюниʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: варкаютиʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: варкаютиʼ
     варˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: варкаюнаˮ
     варˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: варкаютаˮ
     варˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: варкаютоʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [варон, варони]
     варˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: варод   
     варˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: варода  
     варˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: варониʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: вародиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: вародиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: варонаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: вародаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: вародоʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [варон, варони]
     варˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: варод   
     варˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: варода  
     варˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: варониʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: вародиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: вародиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: варонаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: вародаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: вародоʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [вароˮн, вароˮни] 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: варот   
     варˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: варота  
     варˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: вароˮниʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: варотиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: варотиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: вароˮнаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: варотаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: варотоʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: варкаˮн 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: варкаˮн
     варˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: варкат 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: варката 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: варкаˮниʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: варкатиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: варкатиʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: варкаˮнаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: варкатаˮ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: варкатоʼ 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: варкаˮнан  
     варˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: варкаˮнат
     варˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: варкаˮната 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: варкаˮнаниʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: варкаˮнатиʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: варкаˮнатиʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: варкаˮнанаˮ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: варкаˮнатаˮ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: варкаˮнатоʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: варкатан 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: варкатат 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: варкатата 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: варкатаниʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: варкататиʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: варкататиʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: варкатанаˮ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: варкататаˮ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: варкататоʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: вароˮманан  
     варˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: вароˮманат  
     варˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: вароˮманата 
     варˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: вароˮмананиʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: вароˮманатиʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: вароˮманатиʼ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: вароˮмананаˮ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: вароˮманатаˮ
     варˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: вароˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative !Should be added
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: вартмʼ
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: варт  
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: варˮ
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: варниʼ
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: вартиʼ
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: варкʼ
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: вармаˮ
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: вартаˮ # валаˮ ?
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: варˮ 
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: вартамзь
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: вартась 
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: варць   
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: варнинзь
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: вартинзь
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: варканзь
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: вармаць 
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: вартаць # валаць ?
     варˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: вараць
